installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY aaeeeiioouuuyybccddlmnnfjkprrssttvghqwx

PFX N Y 1
PFX N   0           ne         .

PFX E Y 1
PFX E   0           nej        .

PFX W Y 3
PFX W   0           ne         .
PFX W   0           nej        .
PFX W   0           nejne      .

PFX F Y 10
PFX F   0           jedna      .
PFX F   0           dvaa       .
PFX F   0           tria       .
PFX F   0           ctyria     .
PFX F   0           ctyrya     .
PFX F   0           peta       .
PFX F   0           sesta      .
PFX F   0           sedma      .
PFX F   0           osma       .
PFX F   0           deveta     .

SFX P Y 124
SFX P   0           a          [^aeokl]
SFX P   0           u          [^aeoklu]
SFX P   0           ovi        [^aeokl]
SFX P   0           e          [^aeoklurcgh]
SFX P   0           e          [aeiouyaeiouuye]r
SFX P   r           re         [^aeiouyaeiouuye]r
SFX P   0           em         [^aeokl]
SFX P   0           u          [^aeokl]
SFX P   0           um         [^aeokl]
SFX P   0           y          [^aeokl]
SFX P   0           ech        [^aeoklghu]
SFX P   g           zich       g
SFX P   h           zich       [^c]h
SFX P   ch          sich       ch
SFX P   0           ich        u
SFX P   0           a          [^ee]k
SFX P   0           u          [^ee]k
SFX P   0           ovi        [^ee]k
SFX P   0           em         [^ee]k
SFX P   0           u          [^ee]k
SFX P   0           um         [^ee]k
SFX P   k           cich       [^ee]k
SFX P   0           y          [^ee]k
SFX P   ek          ka         ek
SFX P   ek          ku         ek
SFX P   ek          kovi       ek
SFX P   ek          kem        ek
SFX P   ek          ku         ek
SFX P   ek          kum        ek
SFX P   ek          cich       ek
SFX P   ek          ky         ek
SFX P   0           a          [^dtn]ek
SFX P   0           u          [^dtn]ek
SFX P   0           ovi        [^dtn]ek
SFX P   0           em         [^dtn]ek
SFX P   0           ku         [^dtn]ek
SFX P   0           kum        [^dtn]ek
SFX P   0           cich       [^dtn]ek
SFX P   0           ky         [^dtn]ek
SFX P   dek         dka        dek
SFX P   dek         dku        dek
SFX P   dek         dkovi      dek
SFX P   dek         dkem       dek
SFX P   dek         dku        dek
SFX P   dek         dkum       dek
SFX P   dek         dcich      dek
SFX P   dek         dky        dek
SFX P   nek         nka        nek
SFX P   nek         nku        nek
SFX P   nek         nkovi      nek
SFX P   nek         nkem       nek
SFX P   nek         nku        nek
SFX P   nek         nkum       nek
SFX P   nek         ncich      nek
SFX P   nek         nky        nek
SFX P   tek         tka        tek
SFX P   tek         tku        tek
SFX P   tek         tkovi      tek
SFX P   tek         tkem       tek
SFX P   tek         tku        tek
SFX P   tek         tkum       tek
SFX P   tek         tcich      tek
SFX P   tek         tky        tek
SFX P   0           a          [bdtsziou]el
SFX P   0           u          [bdtsziou]el
SFX P   0           ovi        [bdtsziou]el
SFX P   0           e          [bdtsziou]el
SFX P   0           em         [bdtsziou]el
SFX P   0           u          [bdtsziou]el
SFX P   0           um         [bdtsziou]el
SFX P   0           y          [bdtsziou]el
SFX P   0           ech        [bdtsziou]el
SFX P   el          la         [^bdtsziou]el
SFX P   el          lu         [^bdtsziou]el
SFX P   el          lovi       [^bdtsziou]el
SFX P   el          le         [^bdtsziou]el
SFX P   el          li         [^bdtsziou]el
SFX P   el          lem        [^bdtsziou]el
SFX P   el          lu         [^bdtsziou]el
SFX P   el          lum        [^bdtsziou]el
SFX P   el          ly         [^bdtsziou]el
SFX P   el          lech       [^bdtsziou]el
SFX P   0           a          [^e]l
SFX P   0           u          [^e]l
SFX P   0           ovi        [^e]l
SFX P   0           e          [^e]l
SFX P   0           em         [^e]l
SFX P   0           u          [^e]l
SFX P   0           um         [^e]l
SFX P   0           y          [^e]l
SFX P   0           ech        [^e]l
SFX P   o           a          o
SFX P   o           u          o
SFX P   o           ovi        o
SFX P   o           em         o
SFX P   o           u          o
SFX P   o           um         o
SFX P   o           y          o
SFX P   o           ech        [^gk]o
SFX P   o           ach        [gk]o
SFX P   a           y          [^ccdijnrstz]a
SFX P   a           i          [ccijrsz]a
SFX P   da          di         da
SFX P   na          ni         na
SFX P   ta          ti         ta
SFX P   a           ovi        a
SFX P   a           u          a
SFX P   a           o          a
SFX P   a           ou         a
SFX P   a           u          a
SFX P   a           um         a
SFX P   a           ech        [^kdnt]a
SFX P   ka          cich       ka
SFX P   da          dech       da
SFX P   na          nech       na
SFX P   ta          tech       ta
SFX P   e           a          e
SFX P   e           u          e
SFX P   e           ovi        e
SFX P   0           m          e
SFX P   e           u          e
SFX P   e           um         e
SFX P   e           y          e
SFX P   0           ch         e

SFX I Y 18
SFX I   d           di         d
SFX I   n           ni         n
SFX I   t           ti         t
SFX I   h           zi         [^c]h
SFX I   ch          si         ch
SFX I   r           ri         r
SFX I   0           i          [bdfmnptvwccjrsszz]
SFX I   o           i          o
SFX I   el          li         [^bdtsziou]el
SFX I   0           i          [bdtsziou]el
SFX I   0           i          [^e]l
SFX I   k           ci         [^ee]k
SFX I   ek          ci         ek
SFX I   dek         dci        dek
SFX I   nek         nci        nek
SFX I   tek         tci        tek
SFX I   re          ri         re
SFX I   a           i          a

SFX V Y 14
SFX V   0           ove        [^aeklon]
SFX V   a           ove        a
SFX V   e           ove        e
SFX V   0           ove        [^aeiouyaeiouye][^bdaeiouyaeiouye]el
SFX V   el          love       [aeiouyaeiouye][^bdaeiouyaeiouye]el
SFX V   0           ove        [bdaeiouyaeiouye]el
SFX V   0           ove        [^e]l
SFX V   0           ove        [^dtn]ek
SFX V   0           ve         o
SFX V   0           ove        [^ee]k
SFX V   ek          kove       ek
SFX V   0           ove        len
SFX V   en          nove       [^l]en
SFX V   0           ove        [^e]n
