installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.dic
alkoun/PI
analfabetictejsi/YRE
Anastaz/UV
android/PI
arciopat/PIV
Artur/PV
astmatictejsi/YRW
Augustyn/PV
Avar/PIV
Bajgar/PV
bajnejsi/YE
bankrotovani/SN
Bartosik/PV
Barinka/PV
Belgican/PDI
Benedikt/PV
Betlacha/PV
bezbrannejsi/YRE
bezhlavejsi/YRE
bezohlednejsi/YRE
bezprecedentnejsi/YRE
bezuhonnejsi/YRE
bezvyznamnejsi/YRE
biometeorolog/PV
blize/E
bobecek/HPIV
bohapustsi/YRW
Bohumir/PV
bonzak/PI
branibor/PIV
brouk/PI
Brezina/PV
Bubenik/PV
Buzek/PV
bytelnejsi/YRE
Caesar/PI
cenzurovavat/JTN
cimbalista/PD
cvicnejsi/YRE
cechackovstejsi/YRW
Cechoslovak/PI
Cepelka/PV
cerv/PI
ctyrycetina/ZQF
ctyrycetitisicovka/ZQF
ctyrycetkrat/F
ctyrycitka/ZQF
ctyricatero/F
ctyricatery/F
ctyricatery/FY
ctyricatnik/PIF
ctyricaty/YF
ctyricet/FI
ctyricetice/ZQF
ctyricetilety/FYR
ctyricetina/ZQF
ctyricetitisicovka/ZQF
ctyricetkrat/F
ctyricitka/ZQF
cunak/PI
dedousek/PIV
Dejl/PV
dele/E
delegat/PI
dementovat/ATN
detinstejsi/YRW
devadesatery/F
devadesat/FI
devadesatilety/FYR
devadesatitisicovka/ZQF
devadesatkrat/F
diplomat/PDI
dluznejsi/YRE
Dockal/PV
dodavani/SN
dojetejsi/YW
doktor/PI
dokvedlavany/YKRN
dorazitkovat/ATN
dospanejsi/YRW
dotrnout/AN
drahousek/PIV
Drapal/PV
draze/E
duch/PV
duraznejsi/YRW
dvacatero/F
dvacatery/FY
dvacet/FI
dvacetilety/FYR
dvacetitisicovka/ZQF
dvacitka/ZQF
dvourocek/PIV
eisenassky/YKRN
emancipovanejsi/YRE
Emanuel/PV
encyklopedista/PD
endoparazit/PI
existencialistictejsi/YRW
exporter/PI
farmaceut/PI
Filicka/PV
flagelant/PI
folklorista/PD
fousatejsi/YRW
fuser/PIV
garant/PI
garderobier/PI
gigantictejsi/YRE
globalni/YKRN
grazlik/PI
Gubas/UV
gubernator/PI
harlekyn/PI
Haspr/PV
hejsek/PIV
hezoun/PIV
historiograf/PV
hlavickovejsi/YRW
homeopat/PI
horak/PI
hornatejsi/YRE
Houda/PV
hruzostrasnejsi/YRE
huhlani/SN
hulvat/PI
Huml/PV
Hylak/PV
hypertextovejsi/YRW
chlapik/PI
choralista/PD
chudinstejsi/YRE
individualistictejsi/YRW
indosant/PI
inzerovavat/JTN
Ivanic/UV
Ivanov/PV
jedinacek/PI
Jeronym/PV
Jersak/PV
jinonarodnejsi/YRE
jonak/PI
kacer/PI
kadrovactejsi/YRW
Kaja/PV
kapelnik/PI
Kareis/PV
Kelt/PI
Kertesz/PV
Klepal/PV
klimatizovat/ATN
Kocian/PV
Kolda/PV
kolosalnejsi/YRW
komunard/PI
kopista/PD
Kosik/PV
kotonovy/YKRN
kozoroh/PI
kozesnik/PI
krajovejsi/YRW
Krhanek/PV
krotcejsi/YE
Kubala/PV
Kulhanek/PV
Kvasnicka/PV
lapiduch/PIV
laskavejsi/YRW
Lastovicka/PV
lemovany/YKRN
Lenart/PV
lepe/E
Lothar/PV
Loucka/PV
Lucan/PDI
magnetooptictejsi/YRW
manasek/PIV
man/PV
materialistictejsi/YRE
Maurer/PV
mecoun/PI
Mejstrik/PV
mestnani/SN
Mikota/PV
militantnejsi/YRW
mizernejsi/YRE
Mladek/PV
moralizator/PI
morfinista/PD
mrtvejsi/YRE
mutovanejsi/YRW
nacentrovavat/JTN
nahnilejsi/YRW
nakonfigurovavat/JTN
namestek/PIV
nanasenejsi/YRE
naprazenejsi/YRW
napsal/ON
Navara/PV
navazavani/SN
neduzivejsi/YRE
nenasytnejsi/YRW
neostalinistictejsi/YRE
neurotictejsi/YRE
Niederle/PV
nit/ZI
nudnejsi/YRE
oblaceni/SN
oblivanejsi/YRW
obvazanejsi/YRE
odcvalavani/SN
odecitatelnejsi/YRW
Odehnal/PV
odlevany/YKRN
odpornejsi/YRW
odstinovani/SN
oficir/PI
ohrivanejsi/YRW
ochotnicky/YRN
Oliva/PV
onacejsi/YRE
opracovavanejsi/YRW
oprazeny/YKRN
osmdesatery/F
osmdesat/FI
osmdesatilety/FYR
osmdesatitisicovka/ZQF
osmdesatkrat/F
osmdesaty/YF
otrelejsi/YRW
ovad/PI
ovladnutelny/YKRN
packal/PV
padesatery/F
padesat/FI
padesatilety/FYR
padesatitisicovka/ZQF
padesatkrat/F
padesaty/YF
padlejsi/YRE
Pajer/PV
patravejsi/YRW
patriot/PI
Pecenka/PV
pekelnik/PI
Petrak/PV
Pistek/PV
planet/JN
plassi/YE
Pludek/PV
pocitovejsi/YRW
podejmout/IN
podmazat/ATN
podrobnejsi/YRE
podvracenejsi/YW
pokorovany/YKRN
polozakrytejsi/YRW
popast/IN
popuzovani/SN
posel/PV
poslouchatelnejsi/YRW
Pospichal/PV
povalecny/YRN
povazanejsi/YRE
povznesenejsi/YRW
prapraded/PI
prodanejsi/YN
prodavanejsi/YE
profannejsi/YRW
progresista/PD
promiseny/YKRN
propitejsi/YRW
prosukani/SN
protejsek/PIVH
protinacistictejsi/YRE
protispionaznejsi/YRW
predbehovejsi/YRE
predehrani/SN
predehratejsi/YRW
prechylovavany/YKRN
prejimatelnejsi/YW
preportovani/SN
preslozitejsi/YRW
pretrast/IN
preveseni/SN
prijimanejsi/YW
prilehlejsi/YRE
primlouvajici/YN
privezt/ATN
privlecenejsi/YRW
ptak/PI
pucflek/PIV
rak/PI
redaktor/PI
relativnejsi/YRE
Renc/UV
restrukturalizovani/SN
rostak/PI
rozepsanejsi/YRW
rozhekany/YKRN
rozpazovany/YKRN
roztahovanejsi/YRW
rozvazanejsi/YRE
rozvazi/BN
Ruznar/PV
Ryska/PV
sedmak/PI
sedmdesatery/F
sedmdesat/FI
sedmdesatilety/FYR
sedmdesatitisicovka/ZQF
sedmdesatkrat/F
sedmdesaty/YF
Sekerka/PV
sepjatejsi/YRE
sestavenejsi/YRW
sinicovy/YRN
skladnik/PI
slavicek/PIV
slepejsi/YRE
Sloup/PV
soucasnejsi/YRW
spodnejsi/YRE
spoluvlastnik/PI
stabilitni/YKRN
stehlicek/PI
Steiner/PV
subtropictejsi/YRW
sumator/PI
surovejsi/YRE
svrchnejsi/YRE
Sadek/PV
sedesatery/F
sedesat/FI
sedesatilety/FYR
sedesatitisicovka/ZQF
sedesatkrat/F
sedesaty/YF
sibenicnik/PI
Skreta/PV
smejd/HPIV
Stilc/UV
Svajcr/PV
tadzicky/YRN
Tesarek/PV
teskneji/E
tesnejsi/YRW
tovarnik/PI
truchlivejsi/YRE
tricatery/F
tricatnik/PIF
tricet/FI
tricetilety/FYR
tricetitisicovka/ZQF
tricitka/ZQF
Tulach/PV
turek/PIV
ukolovavani/SN
ulisnejsi/YRW
uprchlik/PI
urychlenejsi/YRE
uvazlivejsi/YRW
uzaverovy/YKRN
vadnejsi/YRE
Vanous/PV
Verner/PV
Vincent/PI
Vizek/PV
vlahyplnejsi/YRE
Vrana/PV
vrtcejsi/YRW
vsednejsi/YRE
vybajit/ATN
vyletnik/PI
vyloupavany/YKRN
vylozitelnejsi/YRW
vynasenejsi/YRE
vystlat/ITN
vysperkovavat/JTN
vyvysenejsi/YRW
vzestupnejsi/YRE
zadudani/SN
zakonik/HPIV
zamernejsi/YRW
zaplatitelny/YKRN
zastiplnejsi/YRE
zavest/IN
zavodnictejsi/YRW
zbankrotovani/SN
zmalatnelejsi/YRW
zmineni/SN
znamenitejsi/YRE
zvlhcovat/ATN
Zvonar/UV
zacek/PIV
zihanejsi/YRW
zrout/PI
